Florida, session 2026, SB198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 68 69 Section 1.âSubsection (23) of section 560.103, Florida 70 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (37), (38), and (39) are 71 added to that section, to read: 72 560.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 73 (23)ââMoney services businessâ means any person located in 74 or doing business in this state, from this state, or into this 75 state from locations outside this state or country who acts as a 76 payment instrument seller, foreign currency exchanger, check 77 casher, or money transmitter, or virtual currency kiosk 78 business. 79 (37)ââVirtual currency kioskâ means an electronic terminal 80 that acts as a mechanical agent of the kiosk business, enabling 81 the kiosk business to facilitate the exchange of virtual 82 currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency for a 83 customer. 84 (38)ââVirtual currency kiosk businessâ or âkiosk businessâ 85 means a corporation, limited liability company, limited 86 liability partnership, or foreign entity qualified to do 87 business in this state which offers virtual currency kiosk 88 services to a customer in this state. 89 (39)ââVirtual currency kiosk transactionâ means the process 90 by which a customer uses a virtual currency kiosk to exchange 91 virtual currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency. A 92 transaction begins at the point at which the customer is able to 93 initiate a transaction after the customer is given the option to 94 select the type of transaction or account and does not include 95 any of the screens that display the required terms and 96 conditions, disclaimers, or attestations. 97 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 98 560.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 99 560.105âSupervisory powers; rulemaking.â 100 (2)âThe commission may adopt rules pursuant to ss. 101 120.536(1) and 120.54 to administer this chapter. 102 (b)âRules adopted to regulate money services businesses, 103 including deferred presentment providers and virtual currency 104 kiosk businesses, must be responsive to changes in economic 105 conditions, technology, and industry practices. 106 Section 3.âParagraph (w) of subsection (1) of section 107 560.114, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 108 560.114âDisciplinary actions; penalties.â 109 (1)âThe following actions by a money services business, 110 authorized vendor, or affiliated party constitute grounds for 111 the issuance of a cease and desist order; the issuance of a 112 removal order; the denial, suspension, or revocation of a 113 license; or taking any other action within the authority of the 114 office pursuant to this chapter: 115 (w)âEngaging or advertising engagement in the business of a 116 money services business or deferred presentment provider without 117 a license or registration, unless exempted from licensure or 118 registration. 119 Section 4.âSection 560.125, Florida Statutes, is amended to 120 read: 121 560.125âUnlicensed or unregistered activity; penalties.â 122 (1)âA person may not engage in the business of a money 123 services business or deferred presentment provider in this state 124 unless the person is licensed or registered, or exempted from 125 licensure or registration under this chapter. A deferred 126 presentment transaction conducted by a person not authorized to 127 conduct such transaction under this chapter is void, and the 128 unauthorized person has no right to collect, receive, or retain 129 any principal, interest, or charges relating to such 130 transaction. 131 (2)âOnly a money services business licensed under part II 132 of this chapter may appoint an authorized vendor. Any person 133 acting as a vendor for an unlicensed money transmitter or 134 payment instrument issuer becomes the principal thereof, and no 135 longer merely acts as a vendor, and is liable to the holder or 136 remitter as a principal money transmitter or payment instrument 137 seller. 138 (3)âAny person whose substantial interests are affected by 139 a proceeding brought by the office pursuant to this chapter may, 140 pursuant to s. 560.113, petition any court of competent 141 jurisdiction to enjoin the person or activity that is the 142 subject of the proceeding from violating any of the provisions 143 of this section. For the purpose of this subsection, any money 144 services business licensed under this chapter, any person 145 residing in this state, and any person whose principal place of 146 business is in this state are presumed to be substantially 147 affected. In addition, the interests of a trade organization or 148 association are deemed substantially affected if the interests 149 of any of its members are affected. 150 (4)âThe office may issue and serve upon any person who 151 violates any of the provisions of this section a complaint 152 seeking a cease and desist order or impose an administrative 153 fine as provided in s. 560.114. 154 (5)âA person who violates this section, if the violation 155 involves: 156 (a)âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 157 virtual currency of a value exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 158 in any 12-month period, commits a felony of the third degree, 159 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 160 (b)âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 161 virtual currency of a value totaling or exceeding $20,000 but 162 less than $100,000 in any 12-month period, commits a felony of 163 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 164 775.083, or s. 775.084. 165 (c)âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 166 virtual currency of a value totaling or exceeding $100,000 in 167 any 12-month period, commits a felony of the first degree, 168 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 169 (6)âIn addition to the penalties authorized by s. 775.082, 170 s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, a person who has been convicted of, 171 or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, having 172 violated this section may be sentenced to pay a fine of up to 173 the greater of $250,000 or twice the value of the currency, 174 monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual currency, except 175 that on a second or subsequent violation of this section the 176 fine may be up to the greater of $500,000 or quintuple the value 177 of the currency, monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual 178 currency. 179 (7)âA person who violates this section is also liable for a 180 civil penalty of up to the greater of the value of the currency, 181 monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual currency 182 involved or $25,000. 183 (8)âIn any prosecution brought pursuant to this section, 184 the common law corpus delicti rule does not apply. The 185 defendantâs confession or admission is admissible during trial 186 without the state having to prove the corpus delicti if the 187 court finds in a hearing conducted outside the presence of the 188 jury that the defendantâs confession or admission is 189 trustworthy. Before the court admits the defendantâs confession 190 or admission, the state must prove by a preponderance of the 191 evidence that there is sufficient corroborating evidence that 192 tends to establish the trustworthiness of the statement by the 193 defendant. Hearsay evidence is admissible during the 194 presentation of evidence at the hearing. In making its 195 determination, the court may consider all relevant corroborating 196 evidence, including the defendantâs statements. 197 Section 5.âPart V of chapter 560, Florida Statutes, 198 consisting of ss. 560.501-560.507, Florida Statutes, is created 199 and entitled âVirtual Currency Kiosk Businesses.â 200 Section 6.âSection 560.501, Florida Statutes, is created to 201 read: 202 560.501âDefinitions.âFor purposes of this part, the term: 203 (1)ââBlockchainâ means a mathematically secured, 204 chronological, decentralized, distributed, and digital ledger or 205 database that consists of records of transactions that cannot be 206 altered retroactively. 207 (2)ââBlockchain analyticsâ means the process of examining, 208 monitoring, and gathering insights from the data and transaction 209 patterns on a blockchain network. The primary aims of blockchain 210 analytics are to understand and monitor the networkâs health, 211 track transaction flows, and identify potential security 212 threats, including illicit activity, in order to extract 213 actionable insights. 214 (3)ââDaily transaction limitâ means a new customer being 215 limited to no more than $2,000 in transactions per calendar day, 216 or an existing customer being limited to no more than $10,000 in 217 transactions per calendar day, whether through a single 218 transaction or multiple transactions or whether through one or 219 more virtual currency kiosks. 220 (4)ââExisting customerâ means a customer who has transacted 221 with a kiosk business on its virtual currency kiosk for 7 or 222 more days. 223 (5)ââNew customerâ means a customer who has transacted with 224 a kiosk business on its virtual currency kiosk for fewer than 7 225 days. 226 (6)ââRegistrantâ means a corporation, limited liability 227 company, limited liability partnership, or foreign entity 228 qualified to do business in this state which offers virtual 229 currency kiosk services and receives notice from the office that 230 the agency has granted an application for registration pursuant 231 to the provisions of this part. 232 (7)ââTransaction hashâ means a unique identifier consisting 233 of a string of characters which provides a verifiable record 234 that a transaction has been confirmed and added to the 235 blockchain. 236 (8)ââWalletâ means hardware or software that enables a 237 customer to store, use, send, receive, and spend virtual 238 currency or store virtual currency private keys or passcodes 239 enabling the same. 240 Section 7.âEffective March 1, 2027, section 560.502, 241 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 242 560.502âRegistration required; exemptions; penalties.â 243 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), a virtual 244 currency kiosk business may not operate in this state without 245 first registering, or renewing its registration, in accordance 246 with s. 560.503. The office shall give written notice to each 247 applicant that the office has granted or denied the application 248 for registration. 249 (2)âA money transmitter that is licensed as a money 250 services business pursuant to s. 560.141 and offers virtual 251 currency kiosk services is exempt from registration as a virtual 252 currency kiosk business but is subject to ss. 560.504, 560.505, 253 560.506, and 560.507. 254 (3)âAn entity, in the course of its business, may not act 255 as an intermediary with the ability to unilaterally execute or 256 indefinitely prevent a virtual currency kiosk transaction, or 257 otherwise meet the definition of a money transmitter as defined 258 in s. 560.103, without being licensed as a money services 259 business pursuant to s. 560.141. 260 (4)âA virtual currency kiosk business registration issued 261 under this part is not transferable or assignable. 262 Section 8.âSection 560.503, Florida Statutes, is created to 263 read: 264 560.503âRegistration applications.â 265 (1)âTo apply to be registered as a virtual currency kiosk 266 business under this part, the applicant must submit all of the 267 following information to the office: 268 (a)âA completed registration application on forms 269 prescribed by rule of the commission. The application must 270 include the following information: 271 1.âThe legal name, including any fictitious or trade names 272 used by the applicant in the conduct of its business, and the 273 physical and mailing addresses of the applicant. 274 2.âThe date of the applicantâs formation and the state in 275 which the applicant was formed, if applicable. 276 3.âThe name, social security number, alien identification 277 or taxpayer identification number, business and residence 278 addresses, and employment history for the past 5 years for each 279 control person as defined in s. 560.103. 280 4.âA description of the organizational structure of the 281 applicant, including the identity of any parent or subsidiary of 282 the applicant, and the disclosure of whether any parent or 283 subsidiary is publicly traded. 284 5.âThe name and mailing address of the registered agent in 285 this state for service of process. 286 6.âThe physical address of the location of each virtual 287 currency kiosk through which the applicant proposes to conduct 288 or is conducting business in this state. 289 7.âAn attestation that the applicant has developed clearly 290 documented policies, processes, and procedures regarding the use 291 of blockchain analytics to prevent transfers to wallet addresses 292 linked to known criminal activity, including the manner in which 293 such blockchain analytics activity will integrate into its 294 compliance controls, and that the applicant will maintain and 295 comply with such blockchain analytics policies, processes, and 296 procedures. 297 8.âAny other information as required by this chapter or 298 commission rule. 299 (b)âAny information needed to resolve any deficiencies 300 found in the application within a time period prescribed by 301 rule. 302 (2)âA virtual currency kiosk business operating in this 303 state on or before January 1, 2027, must submit a registration 304 application to the office within 30 days after that date. 305 (3)âA registrant shall report, on a form prescribed by rule 306 of the commission, any change in the information contained in 307 the initial application form or an amendment thereto within 30 308 days after the change is effective. 309 (4)âA registrant must renew its registration annually on or 310 before December 31 of the year preceding the expiration date of 311 the registration. To renew such registration, the registrant 312 must submit a renewal application that provides: 313 (a)âThe information required in paragraph (1)(a) if there 314 are changes in the application information, or an affidavit 315 signed by the registrant that the information remains the same 316 as the prior yearâs information. 317 (b)âUpon request by the office, evidence that the 318 registrant has been operating in compliance with ss. 560.504, 319 560.505, 560.506, and 560.507. Such evidence may be prescribed 320 by rule by the commission and may include, but need not be 321 limited to, all of the following: 322 1.âCurrent disclosures presented to customers during the 323 transaction process. 324 2.âCurrent use of blockchain analytics to prevent transfers 325 to wallet addresses linked to known criminal activity. 326 (5)âA registrant that does not renew its registration by 327 December 31 of the year preceding expiration shall be made 328 inactive for 60 days. A registrant may not conduct business 329 while its registration is inactive. 330 (6)âTo renew an inactive registration, a registrant must, 331 within 60 days after the registration becomes inactive, submit 332 all of the following: 333 (a)âThe information required in paragraph (1)(a) if there 334 are changes in the application information, or an affidavit 335 signed by the registrant that the information remains the same 336 as the prior yearâs information. 337 (b)âEvidence that the registrant was operating in 338 compliance with ss. 560.504, 560.505, 560.506, and 560.507. Such 339 evidence may be prescribed by rule by the commission and may 340 include, but need not be limited to, all of the following: 341 1.âCurrent disclosures presented to customers during the 342 transaction process. 343 2.âReports that confirm compliance with daily transaction 344 limits. 345 3.âCopies of receipts provided to customers. 346 4.âRecords showing refunds provided to customers in 347 required circumstances. 348 5.âCurrent use of blockchain analytics to prevent transfers 349 to wallet addresses linked to known criminal activity. 350 351 Any renewal registration made pursuant to this subsection 352 becomes effective upon the date the office approves the 353 application for registration. The office shall approve the 354 application for renewal registration within a timeframe 355 prescribed by rule. 356 (7)âExcept as provided in s. 560.502(2), failure to submit 357 an application to renew a virtual currency kiosk businessâs 358 registration within 60 days after the registration becomes 359 inactive shall result in the registration becoming expired. If 360 the registration is expired, a new application to register the 361 virtual currency kiosk business pursuant to subsection (1) must 362 be submitted to the office and a certification of registration 363 must be issued by the office before the virtual currency kiosk 364 business may conduct business in this state. 365 (8)âIf a control person of a registrant or prospective 366 registrant has engaged in any unlawful business practice, or 367 been convicted or found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo 368 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime involving 369 dishonest dealing, fraud, acts of moral turpitude, or other acts 370 that reflect an inability to engage lawfully in the business of 371 a registered virtual currency kiosk business, the office may 372 deny the prospective registrantâs initial registration 373 application or the registrantâs renewal application. 374 (9)âThe office shall deny the application of a virtual 375 currency kiosk business that submits a renewal application and 376 fails to provide evidence of compliance upon request pursuant to 377 paragraph (4)(b) or as required in paragraph (6)(b). 378 (10)âAny false statement made by a virtual currency kiosk 379 business in an application for registration under this section 380 renders the registration void. A void registration may not be 381 construed as creating a defense to any prosecution for violation 382 of this chapter. 383 Section 9.âSection 560.504, Florida Statutes, is created to 384 read: 385 560.504âDisclosures.âBefore a customer initiates a virtual 386 currency kiosk transaction, a virtual currency kiosk business 387 must ensure that its virtual currency kiosk: 388 (1)âRequires the customer to confirm whether the customer 389 has conducted any transactions at another virtual currency kiosk 390 on the same calendar day and any amount of such transactions to 391 determine how much, if any, the customer may transact at the 392 virtual currency kiosk before reaching the appropriate daily 393 transaction limit. 394 (2)âClearly and conspicuously display the following 395 disclosure to the customer on the screen: 396 397 WARNING: FRAUD OFTEN STARTS WITH CONTACT FROM A 398 STRANGER. IF YOU HAVE BEEN DIRECTED TO THIS MACHINE BY 399 SOMEONE CLAIMING TO BE A GOVERNMENT AGENT, BILL 400 COLLECTOR, LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, OR ANYONE YOU DO 401 NOT KNOW PERSONALLY, STOP THIS TRANSACTION IMMEDIATELY 402 AND CONTACT YOUR FINANCIAL ADVISOR OR LOCAL LAW 403 ENFORCEMENT. 404 405 Section 10.âSection 560.505, Florida Statutes, is created 406 to read: 407 560.505âTransaction limits.âA virtual currency kiosk 408 business may not permit a new customer to transact more than 409 $2,000 per calendar day, whether through a single transaction or 410 multiple transactions or whether through one or more virtual 411 currency kiosks. A virtual currency kiosk business may not 412 permit an existing customer to transact more than $10,000 per 413 calendar day, whether through a single transaction or multiple 414 transactions or whether through one or more virtual currency 415 kiosks. 416 Section 11.âSection 560.506, Florida Statutes, is created 417 to read: 418 560.506âMandatory receipt.âUpon completion of a virtual 419 currency transaction, the virtual currency kiosk business must 420 provide the customer with a choice of a physical or electronic 421 receipt that includes all of the following: 422 (1)âThe name and contact information of the virtual 423 currency kiosk business, including an e-mail address and a toll 424 free telephone number for such business. 425 (2)âThe date, time, amount of the transaction in United 426 States dollars, and type of transaction. 427 (3)âThe transaction hash and each wallet used. 428 (4)âThe total fee charged for the transaction. 429 (5)âThe exchange rate, if applicable. 430 (6)âA statement of the virtual currency kioskâs liability, 431 if any, for nondelivery or delayed delivery of the virtual 432 currency. 433 (7)âThe refund policy of the virtual currency kiosk 434 business. 435 Section 12.âSection 560.507, Florida Statutes, is created 436 to read: 437 560.507âMandatory refund.âA virtual currency kiosk business 438 must issue a full refund within 72 hours to a customer for the 439 customerâs first virtual currency transaction if all of the 440 following conditions are met: 441 (1)âWithin 60 days, the customer notifies the virtual 442 currency kiosk business and a law enforcement or governmental 443 agency regarding the fraudulent nature of the transaction. 444 (2)âThe customer provides proof of the alleged fraud to the 445 virtual currency kiosk business, such as a police report or a 446 notarized affidavit. 447 Section 13.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 448 act, this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.